District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1401

Declaration of policy.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 2, 41 DCR 4636
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181

History

1981 Ed., § 2-4001.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 10-152

10-152: Section 19(c) of D.C. Law 10-152 provided that the provisions of the act are to be liberally construed so as to effectuate those powers which are specifically enumerated.